Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3010.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-21 of the General Laws entitled "Health and Safety of Pupils" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-21-44. Termination for cause -- Non-teacher employees -- List maintained.
(a) Whenever a non-teacher employee’s employment with a school is terminated for good
and just cause by a principal, superintendent, school committee or other governing body of a public
school, a private school, a school district, a charter public school, or a mayoral academy (hereinafter
collectively referred to as a “school”), the school’s governing body shall, within sixty (60) days of
the termination, or in cases where the termination is appealed, within sixty (60) days after the
conclusion of the appeal filed by the terminated non-teacher employee, and the termination is
upheld, furnish the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education (the
“department”) with the identity of the terminated non-teacher employee and the good and just cause
for the termination. Provided, this section shall not apply to:
(1) The nonrenewal of a contract of a non-teacher employee without cause or unrelated to
misconduct or performance; or
(2) The termination of a non-teacher employee due to fiscal exigency or program
reorganization.
(b) The department shall maintain a list of those non-teacher employees who have been
terminated for good and just cause as well as the good and just cause for the termination (the “list”),
and shall update the list monthly to include any additional names and cause submitted pursuant to

the provisions of this section. The department shall establish a tracking system for reporting these
names and causes, as well as to provide access to these names and causes, to hiring authorities.
This list shall be accessible only to the hiring authority of any private, parochial, charter, or public
school or school district.
(c) The list shall not be a public record pursuant to chapter 2 of title 38 ("access to public
records"). This section shall not abrogate or modify any existing statutory or common law
privileges or immunities.
(d) As used herein, the term “non-teacher employee” means any person working within or
for a school whose employment with the school is not subject to the provisions of chapter 13 of
title 16.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005533
========
LC005533 - Page 2 of 3